Illinois, session 104th, HB1084.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Revised Cities and Villages Act of 1941 is 5amended by adding Section 21-24.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 20/21-24.5 new)7    Sec. 21-24.5. Recall election; Mayor of Chicago.8    (a) The recall of the Mayor of Chicago may be proposed by a 9petition signed by a number of electors equal in number to at 10least 15% of the total votes cast for Mayor in the preceding 11election at which the Mayor was elected, with at least 50 12signatures from each ward. A petition must be signed by the 13petitioning electors not more than 150 days after an affidavit 14has been filed with the board of election commissioners 15providing notice of intent to circulate a petition to recall 16the Mayor. The affidavit may be filed no sooner than 6 months 17after the beginning of the Mayor's term of office. The 18affidavit must be signed by the proponent of the recall 19petition and at least 2 aldermen.20    (b) The form of the petition, circulation, and procedure 21for determining the validity and sufficiency of a petition 22shall be as provided by law. If the petition is valid and 23sufficient, the board of election commissioners shall certify   HB1084- 2 -LRB104 03388 RTM 13410 b1the petition not more than 100 days after the date the petition 2was filed, and the question "Shall (name) be recalled from the 3office of Mayor?" must be submitted to the electors at a 4special recall election called by the board of election 5commissioners and to occur not more than 100 days after 6certification of the petition. A recall petition certified by 7the board of election commissioners may not be withdrawn. If a 8recall petition has been certified by the board of election 9commissioners, then another recall petition may not be 10initiated against the Mayor during the remainder of the 11current term of office of the Mayor. Any recall petition or 12recall election pending on the date of the next election at 13which a candidate for Mayor is elected is void.14    The Mayor is immediately removed upon certification of the 15special recall election results if a majority of the electors 16voting on the question vote to recall the Mayor. If the Mayor 17is removed, then (i) the Vice Mayor shall serve as Mayor until 18the Mayor elected at the special successor election or special 19runoff election is qualified and (ii) the candidate who 20receives a majority of votes under subsection (c) in the 21special successor election or the candidate who receives the 22highest number of votes in the special runoff election is 23elected Mayor for the balance of the term. 24    (c) If a petition to recall the Mayor has been filed with 25the board of election commissioners, a person eligible to 26serve as Mayor may propose his or her candidacy for the special   HB1084- 3 -LRB104 03388 RTM 13410 b1successor election by a successor candidate petition signed by 2at least 12,500 legal voters of the City, not more than 50 days 3after a recall petition has been filed with the board of 4election commissioners. All successor candidate petitions and 5procedure with respect to the petitions shall conform in other 6respects to the provisions of the election and ballot laws 7then in force in the City of Chicago concerning the nomination 8of independent candidates for public office by petition. If 9the successor candidate petition is valid and sufficient, the 10board of election commissioners shall certify the petition not 11more than 100 days after the date the petition to recall the 12Mayor was filed.13    If the Mayor is removed by the special recall election 14under subsection (b), the names of candidates for Mayor whose 15successor candidate petitions were certified by the board of 16election commissions must be submitted to the electors at a 17special successor election called by the board of election 18commissioners to be held 60 days after the special recall 19election. If no candidate receives a majority of the votes in 20the special successor election, a special runoff election 21shall be held no later than 60 days after the special successor 22election, and only the names of the candidates receiving the 23highest and second highest number of votes at the special 24successor election shall appear on the ballot.25    If more than one candidate received the highest or second 26highest number of votes at the special successor election, the   HB1084- 4 -LRB104 03388 RTM 13410 b1names of all candidates receiving the highest and second 2highest number of votes shall appear on the ballot at the 3special runoff election. The candidate receiving the highest 4number of votes at the special runoff election shall be 5declared elected. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.